Utah statutes.
17-15-29.   Easement for utility use -- Realignment at property owner's expense.

(1)  As used in this section, "utility easement" means an easement acquired by a county through the use of eminent domain to provide utility services to the county's residents.

(2)  The owner of a servient estate subject to a utility easement may realign the easement at the servient estate owner's expense unless the alignment cannot be reasonably changed because of engineering or safety requirements.



Enacted by Chapter 246, 2007 General Session

